src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-xaap_gt-norm.yaml
# Author: Csilla HORVATH (Szeged Team)

Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)

  Noun - ха̄п: # "(eng) boat/(hun) csónak/(rus) лодка"  - full paradigm
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom: ха̄п
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc: ха̄пт
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat: ха̄пн
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl: ха̄пныл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins: ха̄пыл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Tra: ха̄пыг

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom: ха̄пыг
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc: ха̄пыгт
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat: ха̄пыгн
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl: ха̄пыгныл
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins: ха̄пыгтыл

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom: ха̄пыт
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc: ха̄пытт
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat: ха̄пытн
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl: ха̄пытныл
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins: ха̄пытыл

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ха̄пум
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ха̄пумт
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: ха̄пумн
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ха̄пумныл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: ха̄пумтыл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: ха̄пумыг

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ха̄пагум
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: ха̄пагумт
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: ха̄пагумн
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: ха̄пагумныл
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: ха̄пагумтыл

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ха̄панум
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ха̄панумт
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ха̄панумн
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ха̄панумныл
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: ха̄панумтыл

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ха̄пын
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ха̄пынт
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: ха̄пынн
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ха̄пынныл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: ха̄пынтыл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: ха̄пыныг

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ха̄пагын, ха̄пагн]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: ха̄пагынт
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: ха̄пагынн
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: ха̄пагынныл
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: ха̄пагынтыл

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [ха̄панын, ха̄пан]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ха̄панынт, ха̄пант]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [ха̄панынн, ха̄панн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ха̄панынныл, ха̄панныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [ха̄панынтыл, ха̄пантыл]

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ха̄пе
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ха̄пе̄т, ха̄пет]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [ха̄пе̄н, ха̄пен]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [ха̄пе̄ныл, ха̄пеныл]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [ха̄пе̄нтыл, ха̄пентыл]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [ха̄пе̄г, ха̄пег]

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ха̄паге
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [ха̄паге̄т, ха̄пагет]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [ха̄паге̄н, ха̄паген]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [ха̄паге̄ныл, ха̄пагеныл]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [ха̄паге̄тыл, ха̄пагетыл]

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ха̄панэ
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ха̄панэ̄т, ха̄панэт]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [ха̄панэ̄н, ха̄панэн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ха̄панэ̄ныл, ха̄панэныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [ха̄панэ̄тыл, ха̄панэтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [ха̄пме̄н, ха̄пмен]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [ха̄пме̄нт, ха̄пмент]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [ха̄пме̄нн, ха̄пменн]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ха̄пме̄нныл, ха̄пменныл]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [ха̄пме̄нтыл, ха̄пментыл]

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ха̄пагаме̄н, ха̄пагамен, ха̄пагме̄н]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [ха̄пагаме̄нт, ха̄пагамент, ха̄пагме̄нт]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [ха̄пагаме̄нн, ха̄пагаменн, ха̄пагме̄нн]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [ха̄пагаме̄нныл, ха̄пагаменныл, ха̄пагме̄нныл]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [ха̄пагаме̄нтыл, ха̄пагаментыл, ха̄пагме̄нтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [ха̄панаме̄н, ха̄панамен]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ха̄панаме̄нт, ха̄панамент]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [ха̄панаме̄нн, ха̄панаменн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ха̄панаме̄нныл, ха̄панаменныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [ха̄панаме̄нтыл, ха̄панаментыл]

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [ха̄пын, ха̄пы̄н]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [ха̄пынт, ха̄пы̄нт] 
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [ха̄пынн, ха̄пы̄нн]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [ха̄пынныл, ха̄пы̄нныл]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [ха̄пынтыл, ха̄пы̄нтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ха̄пагын, ха̄пагы̄н]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [ха̄пагынт, ха̄пагы̄нт]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [ха̄пагынн, ха̄пагы̄нн]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [ха̄пагынныл, ха̄пагы̄нныл]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [ха̄пагынтыл, ха̄пагы̄нтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [ха̄панын, ха̄паны̄н, ха̄пан]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ха̄панынт, ха̄паны̄нт, ха̄пант]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [ха̄панынн, ха̄паны̄нн, ха̄панн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ха̄панынныл, ха̄паны̄нныл, ха̄панныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [ха̄панынтыл, ха̄паны̄нтыл, ха̄пантыл]

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [ха̄пе̄н, ха̄пен]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [ха̄пе̄нт, ха̄пент]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [ха̄пе̄нн, ха̄пенн]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [ха̄пе̄нныл, ха̄пенныл]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [ха̄пе̄нтыл, ха̄пентыл]

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ха̄паге̄н, ха̄паген]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [ха̄паге̄нт, ха̄пагент]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [ха̄паге̄нн, ха̄пагенн]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [ха̄паге̄нныл, ха̄пагенныл]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [ха̄паге̄нтыл, ха̄пагентыл]

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [ха̄панэ̄н, ха̄панэн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ха̄панэ̄нт, ха̄панэнт]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [ха̄панэ̄нн, ха̄панэнн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ха̄панэ̄нныл, ха̄панэнныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [ха̄панэ̄нтыл, ха̄панэнтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ха̄пув
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ха̄пувт
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: ха̄пувн
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ха̄пувныл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: ха̄пувтыл

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ха̄пагув
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: ха̄пагувт
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: ха̄пагувн
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: ха̄пагувныл
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: ха̄пагувтыл

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ха̄панув
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ха̄панувт
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: ха̄панувн
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ха̄панувныл
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: ха̄панувтыл

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [ха̄пын, ха̄пы̄н] 
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ха̄пынт, ха̄пы̄нт]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [ха̄пынн, ха̄пы̄нн]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [ха̄пынныл, ха̄пы̄нныл]
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [ха̄пынтыл, ха̄пы̄нтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ха̄пагын, ха̄пагы̄н]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [ха̄пагынт, ха̄пагы̄нт]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [ха̄пагынн, ха̄пагы̄нн]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [ха̄пагынныл, ха̄пагы̄нныл]
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [ха̄пагынтыл, ха̄пагы̄нтыл]

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [ха̄панын, ха̄паны̄н, ха̄пан]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ха̄панынт, ха̄паны̄нт, ха̄пант]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [ха̄панынн, ха̄паны̄нн, ха̄панн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ха̄панынныл, ха̄паны̄нныл, ха̄панныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [ха̄панынтыл, ха̄паны̄нтыл, ха̄пантыл]

     ха̄п+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ха̄паныл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ха̄панылт
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: ха̄панылн
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ха̄панылныл
     ха̄п+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: ха̄панылтыл

     ха̄п+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ха̄паганыл
     ха̄п+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: ха̄паганылт
     ха̄п+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: ха̄паганылн
     ха̄п+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: ха̄паганылныл
     ха̄п+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: ха̄паганылтыл

     ха̄п+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [ха̄пананыл, ха̄паныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ха̄пананылт, ха̄панылт]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [ха̄пананылн, ха̄панылн]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ха̄пананылныл, ха̄панылныл]
     ха̄п+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [ха̄пананылтыл, ха̄панылтыл]
